Arkansas, session 2025, SB143.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 8, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
12-8-130. Funding for probation and parole assistance.
After the deductions as specified in § 19-5-202 have been made and
before distributions provided in the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et
seq., the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall transfer on his or her
books and those of the Treasurer of State and the Auditor of State the sum of
one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) from sales and use tax collections
deposited into a cash fund deposited in the State Treasury as determined by
the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State for the Department of Public Safety —
*CEB065*
02-13-2025 08:58:29 CEB065

As Engrossed: S2/13/25 SB143
Division of Arkansas State Police to be used for:
(1) Crime reduction and prevention programs; and
(2) Assistance to the Division of Community Correction in the
provision of probation, parole, and post-release supervision services.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 12-8-104, concerning the Director of the
Division of Arkansas State Police, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(l) The Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may:
(1) Designate officers to participate in crime reduction and
prevention programs and to assist the Division of Community Correction in the
provision of probation, parole, and post-release supervision services;
(2) Enter into an agreement with the sheriff of a county to:
(A) Designate deputy sheriffs to participate in crime
reduction and prevention programs and to assist the Division of Community
Correction in the provision of probation, parole, and post-release
supervision services; and
(B) Provide compensation for a sheriff's participation in
the agreement; and
(3) Coordinate with the Director of the Division of Community
Correction to provide assistance in the provision of probation, parole, and
post-release supervision services.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 12-8-106(e), concerning the duties of the
Division of Arkansas State Police, is amended to read as follows:
(e)(1) However, this This chapter shall not be construed so as to take
away any authority of the regularly constituted peace officers in the state,
but the Division of Arkansas State Police shall cooperate with them in the
enforcement of the criminal laws of the state and assist such officers either
in the enforcement of the law or apprehension of criminals.
(2) Officers designated by the director under 12-8-104(l)(1) are
authorized to:
(A) Participate in crime reduction and prevention
programs; and
(B) Assist the Division of Community Correction in the
provision of probation, parole, and post-release supervision services.
02-13-2025 08:58:29 CEB065

As Engrossed: S2/13/25 SB143
(3) Officers designated by the director under § 12-8-104(l)(1)
shall not:
(A) Stop or detain a person without reasonable cause to
arrest the person;
(B) Conduct a warrantless search of a person or his or her
property; or
(C) Execute a warrant containing an exception to the
requirement for the executing officer to make known the officer's presence
and authority for entering the dwelling, commonly known as a "no-knock
warrant".

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 12-27-126(d), concerning the duties of the
Director of the Division of Community Correction, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(6) Coordinate with the Director of the Division of Arkansas
State Police regarding assistance with the provision of probation, parole,
and post-release supervision services under § 12-8-104(l).

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code Title 14, Chapter 15, Subchapter 5, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
14-15-507. Agreement with Division of Arkansas State Police.
The sheriff of a county may enter into an agreement under § 12-8-
104(l)(2) to designate deputy sheriffs to:
(1) Participate in crime reduction and prevention programs; and
(2) Provide assistance to the Division of Community Correction
in the provision of probation, parole, and post-release supervision services.

/s/B. King








02-13-2025 08:58:29 CEB065